Illinois, session 104th, HB5556.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Statewide Innovation Development and 5Economy Act is amended by changing Sections 5-5, 5-10, 5-15, 65-20, 5-30, 5-35, 5-45, and 5-70 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 475/5-5)8    Sec. 5-5. Purpose; findings. 9    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that the 10purpose of this Act is to promote, stimulate, and develop the 11general and economic welfare of the State of Illinois and its 12communities and to assist in the development and redevelopment 13of major tourism, entertainment, retail, and related projects 14within eligible areas of the State, thereby creating new jobs, 15stimulating significant capital investment, and promoting the 16general welfare of the citizens of this State, by authorizing 17municipalities and counties to issue sales tax and revenue 18(STAR) bonds for the financing of STAR bond projects, as 19defined in Section 5-10, and to otherwise exercise the powers 20and authorities granted to municipalities.21    (b) The General Assembly further finds and declares that:22        (1) It is the policy of the State, in the interest of 23    promoting the health, safety, morals, and general welfare   HB5556- 2 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    of all the people of the State, to provide incentives to 2    create new job opportunities, and to promote major 3    tourism, entertainment, retail, and related projects 4    within the State.5        (2) It is in the public interest to limit the portion 6    of the aggregate proceeds of STAR bonds issued that are 7    derived from the State sales tax increment pledged to pay 8    STAR bonds in any STAR bond district to not more than 50% 9    of the total development costs for a STAR bond project in 10    the STAR bond district as set forth in subsection (g) of 11    Section 5-45.12        (3) As a result of the costs of land assemblage, 13    financing, and infrastructure and other project costs, the 14    private sector, without the assistance contemplated in 15    this Act, is unable to develop major tourism, 16    entertainment, retail, and related projects in some parts 17    of the State.18        (4) The type of projects for which this Act is 19    intended must be of a certain size and scope and must be 20    developed in a cohesive and comprehensive manner.21        (5) The eligible tracts of land are more likely to 22    remain underused and undeveloped or to be developed in a 23    piecemeal manner resulting in inefficient and poorly 24    planned developments that do not maximize job creation, 25    job retention, and tax revenue generation within the 26    State.  HB5556- 3 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1        (6) There are multiple eligible areas in the State 2    that could benefit from this Act.3        (7) Investment in major tourism, entertainment, 4    retail, and related development within the State would 5    stimulate economic activity in the State, including the 6    creation and maintenance of jobs, the creation of new and 7    lasting infrastructure and other improvements, and the 8    attraction and retention of interstate tourists and 9    entertainment events that generate significant economic 10    activity.11        (8) The continual encouragement, development, growth, 12    and expansion of major tourism, entertainment, retail, and 13    related projects within the State requires a cooperative 14    and continuous partnership between government and the 15    private sector.16        (9) The State has a responsibility to help create a 17    favorable climate for new and improved job opportunities 18    for its citizens and to increase the tax base of the State 19    and its political subdivisions by encouraging development 20    of major retail and entertainment spaces within the State 21    by the private sector.22        (10) The provision of additional incentives by the 23    State and its political subdivisions will relieve 24    conditions of unemployment, maintain existing levels of 25    employment, create new job opportunities, retain jobs 26    within the State, increase commerce within the State, and   HB5556- 4 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    increase the tax base of the State and its political 2    subdivisions.3        (11) The powers conferred by this Act promote and 4    protect the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the 5    State and are for a public purpose and public use for which 6    public money and resources may be expended.7        (12) The necessity in the public interest for the 8    provisions of this Act is hereby declared as a matter of 9    legislative determination.10(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 11    (50 ILCS 475/5-10)12    Sec. 5-10. Definitions. In this Act:13    "Base year" means the calendar year immediately before the 14calendar year in which the Office of the Governor approves the 15first STAR bond project within the STAR bond district.16    "Commence work" means the manifest commencement of actual 17operations on the development site, such as erecting a 18building, site mobilization, general on-site and off-site 19grading and utility installations, commencing design and 20construction documentation, ordering lead-time materials, 21excavating the ground to lay a foundation or a basement, or 22work of like description that a reasonable person would 23recognize as being done with the intention and purpose to 24continue work until the project is completed.25    "Corporate authority" or "corporate authorities" means the   HB5556- 5 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1county board of a county; the mayor and alderpersons or 2similar body when the reference is to cities; the president 3and trustees or similar body when the reference is to villages 4or incorporated towns; and the council when the reference is 5to municipalities under the commission form of government.6    "De minimis amount" means an amount less than 15% of the 7land area within a STAR bond district.8    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity.10    "Developer" means any individual, corporation, trust, 11estate, partnership, limited liability partnership, limited 12liability company, or other entity. "Developer" does not 13include a not-for-profit entity, political subdivision, or 14other agency or instrumentality of the State.15    "Development user" means an owner, operator, licensee, 16codeveloper, subdeveloper, or tenant that: (i) operates a 17business within a STAR bond district that is a retail store, 18hotel, or entertainment venue; (ii) does not have another 19Illinois location within a 30-mile radius at the time of 20opening or, for a NOVA urban district, within a 2-mile radius; 21and (iii) makes an initial capital investment, including 22project costs and other direct costs, of not less than 23$30,000,000 for the business or, for a NOVA urban district, 24makes in aggregate with other development users capital 25investments, including project costs and other direct costs, 26of not less than $60,000,000.  HB5556- 6 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 2Opportunity. 3    "Economic development region" means the counties 4encompassed within any one of the 10 economic development 5regions recognized by the Department on the effective date of 6this Act.7    "Eligible area" means, in respect of any STAR bond 8district other than a NOVA urban district, contiguous parcels 9of real property that meet all of the following: (i) the 10property is directly and substantially benefited by the 11proposed STAR bond district plan; (ii) at least 50% of the 12total land area of the real property is located within an 13underserved area, as defined by the Department at the time the 14STAR bond district plan is submitted; (iii) the property is 15located in an area with not less than 10,000 residents within a 165-mile radius of the proposed district; (iv) the property is 17located 15 miles or less from either a State highway or federal 18interstate highway. "Eligible area" means, in respect of a 19NOVA urban district, contiguous parcels of real property (land 20or air rights) that meet all of the following: (i) the property 21is directly and substantially benefited by the proposed STAR 22bond district plan; (ii) the property includes one or more 23parcel boundaries located within 2 miles or less from existing 24public assembly, convention, and other civic and cultural 25facilities and attractions directly and substantially 26benefited by the proposed STAR bond district plan; (iii) the   HB5556- 7 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1property is located in an area with not less than 10,000 2residents within a 2-mile radius of the proposed district; and 3(iv) the property is located one-quarter mile or less from a 4commuter rail station and either a State highway or federal 5interstate highway. ; and (v) the 6    For an area to be an eligible area, is found by the 7governing body of the political subdivision must find that the 8area meets to meet the following requirements:9        (1) the use, condition, and character of the buildings 10    in the area, if any, are not consistent with the purposes 11    set forth in Section 5-5;12        (2) a STAR bond district within the area is expected 13    to create or retain job opportunities within the political 14    subdivision;15        (3) a STAR bond district within the area will serve to 16    further the development of adjacent areas; 17        (4) without the availability of STAR bonds, the 18    projects described in the STAR bond district plan would 19    not be feasible in the area;20        (5) a STAR bond district will strengthen the 21    commercial sector of the political subdivision;22        (6) a STAR bond district will enhance the tax base of 23    the political subdivision; and24        (7) with respect to a NOVA urban district, a STAR bond 25    district will strengthen, grow, and enhance the 26    visitation, business and operation of existing public   HB5556- 8 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    assembly, convention, and other civic and cultural 2    facilities and attractions; and3        (8) the formation of a STAR bond district is in the 4    best interest of the political subdivision.5    The findings described in paragraphs (1) through (7) are 6subject to the review process provided in subsections (e) and 7(f) of Section 5-20.8    For the purposes of this definition, the area may be 9bisected by streets, highways, roads, alleys, railways, bike 10paths, streams, rivers, and other waterways, and other public 11land and facilities and still be deemed contiguous.12    "Entertainment venue" means a business that has a primary 13use of providing a venue for entertainment attractions, 14destination-oriented retail facilities, corporate brand 15development and entertainment-based media, rides, or other 16activities oriented toward the entertainment and amusement of 17its patrons.18    "Feasibility study" means the feasibility study described 19in subsection (b) of Section 5-30. 20    "Hotel" has the same meaning given to that term in Section 212 of the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act.22    "Infrastructure" means the public improvements and private 23improvements that serve the public purposes set forth in 24Section 5-5 of this Act and that benefit the STAR bond district 25or any STAR bond projects, including, but not limited to, 26streets, drives and driveways, traffic and directional signs   HB5556- 9 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1and signals, parking lots and parking facilities, 2interchanges, highways, sidewalks, bridges, underpasses and 3overpasses, bike and walking trails, landscaping and site 4features, sanitary and storm sewers, and lift stations, 5drainage conduits, channels, levees, canals, storm water 6detention and retention facilities, utilities and utility 7connections, utility distribution systems, railway and rail 8yard improvements, transit stations and related facilities, 9transit vehicles and mobility systems, digital media and 10signage, substructure and foundations, structural slabs and 11transfer structures, district energy facilities, low voltage 12systems, mobilization and site preparation, earthwork and 13earth retention systems, soil removal and remediation, 14building enclosure systems, site improvements that serve as an 15engineered barrier addressing ground level or below ground 16level environmental contamination and remediation, vertical 17circulation, water mains and extensions, and street and 18parking lot lighting and connections.19    "Local sales taxes" means any locally imposed taxes 20received by a municipality, county, or other local 21governmental entity arising from sales by retailers and 22servicemen within a STAR bond district. "Local sales taxes" 23includes business district sales taxes, taxes imposed under 24Section 5-50, and that portion of the net revenue allocated 25from the Local Government Tax Fund and the County and Mass 26Transit District Fund to the municipality, county, or other   HB5556- 10 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1governmental entity under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 2the Use Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, and the Service 3Occupation Tax Act from transactions at places of business 4located in a STAR bond district. "Local sales taxes" does not 5include (i) any taxes authorized under the Local Mass Transit 6District Act or the Metro-East Park and Recreation District 7Act for so long as the applicable taxing district does not 8impose a tax on real property, (ii) any county school facility 9and resources occupation taxes imposed under Section 5-1006.7 10of the Counties Code, (iii) any taxes authorized under the 11Flood Prevention District Act, (iv) any taxes authorized under 12the Special County Occupation Tax For Public Safety, Public 13Facilities, Mental Health, Substance Abuse, or Transportation 14Law, (v) any taxes authorized under the Regional 15Transportation Authority Act, (vi) any taxes authorized under 16the County Motor Fuel Tax Law, or (vii) any taxes authorized 17under the Municipal Motor Fuel Tax Law.18    "Local sales tax increment" means:19        (1) with respect to local sales taxes administered by 20    a municipality, county, or other unit of local government, 21    that portion of the local sales tax that is in excess of 22    the aggregate local sales tax in the district for the same 23    month in the base year, as determined by the respective 24    municipality, county, or other unit of local government; 25    the Department of Revenue shall allocate the local sales 26    tax increment only if the local sales tax is administered   HB5556- 11 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    by the Department; and2        (2) with respect to local sales taxes administered by 3    the Department of Revenue:4            (A) except with respect to the 0.25% county 5        portion of the 6.25% State rate, all the local sales 6        tax paid by taxpayers in the district that is in excess 7        of the aggregate local sales tax paid by taxpayers in 8        the district for the same month in the base year, as 9        determined by the Department of Revenue; and10            (B) with respect to the 0.25% county portion of 11        the 6.25% State rate, in the case of a STAR bond 12        district that is partially or wholly within a 13        municipality, that portion of the 0.25% county portion 14        of the 6.25% rate paid by taxpayers in the district for 15        sales made within the corporate limits of the 16        municipality that is in excess of the aggregate local 17        sales tax paid by taxpayers in the district for sales 18        made within the corporate limits of the municipality 19        for the same month in the base year, as determined by 20        the Department of Revenue, but only if the corporate 21        authorities of the county adopt an ordinance, and file 22        a copy of the ordinance with the Department of Revenue 23        within the same time frames as required for STAR bond 24        occupation taxes under Section 5-50, that designates 25        the taxes as part of the local sales tax increment 26        under this Act.  HB5556- 12 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "Market study" means a study to determine the ability of 2the proposed STAR bond project to gain market share locally 3and regionally and to remain profitable after the term of 4repayment of STAR bonds.5    "Master developer" means a developer cooperating with a 6political subdivision to plan, develop, and implement a STAR 7bond project plan for a STAR bond district. Subject to the 8limitations of Section 5-40, the master developer may work 9with and transfer certain development rights to other 10developers for the purpose of implementing STAR bond project 11plans and achieving the purposes of this Act. A master 12developer for a STAR bond district shall be appointed by a 13political subdivision in the resolution establishing the STAR 14bond district or, in the case of a NOVA urban district, by the 15State or the political subdivision, and the master developer 16or its affiliate must, at the time of appointment, own or have 17control of, through purchase agreements, option contracts, or 18other means, not less than 50% of the acreage within the STAR 19bond district. "Master developer" also means any successor 20developer who has assumed the role and responsibilities of the 21original master developer through the execution of an amended 22master development agreement and has been approved as the 23master developer through resolution by the applicable 24political subdivision.25    "Master development agreement" means an agreement between 26the master developer (or any approved successor developers)   HB5556- 13 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1and the political subdivision or, in the case of a NOVA urban 2district, the State, to govern a STAR bond district and any 3STAR bond projects.4    "Municipality" means the city, village, or incorporated 5town in which a proposed STAR bond district is located. 6    "New Opportunities for Vacation and Adventure District" or 7"NOVA district" means a STAR bond district that encompasses a 8minimum of 500 contiguous acres and, during the STAR bond 9district plan approval process, demonstrates a reasonable 10expectation of (1) producing a capital investment of at least 11$500,000,000, (2) generating not less than $300,000,000 in 12average annual gross sales over the life of the district, (3) 13attracting at least 1,000,000 average annual visitors over the 14life of the district annually, and (4) creating a minimum of 151,500 average annual jobs over the life of the district.16    "New Opportunities for Vacation and Adventure Urban 17District" or "NOVA urban district" means a STAR bond district 18that encompasses a minimum of 20 contiguous acres of land or 19air rights and, during the STAR bond district plan approval 20process, demonstrates a reasonable expectation of (1) 21producing an initial capital investment of at least 22$1,000,000,000, of which 75% shall be infrastructure project 23costs, (2) generating not less than $450,000,000 in average 24annual gross sales over the life of the district, (3) 25attracting at least 2,000,000 average annual visitors over the 26life of the district, and (4) creating a minimum of 3,000   HB5556- 14 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1average annual jobs over the life of the district. 2    "Pledged STAR revenues" means those sales tax revenues and 3other sources of funds that are pledged to pay debt service on 4STAR bonds or to pay project costs under Section 5-45. 5Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any 6State sales tax increment or local sales tax increment from a 7retail entity initiating operations in a STAR bond district 8while terminating operations at another Illinois location 9within 25 miles of the STAR bond district or, for a NOVA urban 10district, within 2 miles of the STAR bond district shall not 11constitute pledged STAR revenues or be available to pay 12principal and interest on STAR bonds. For purposes of this 13definition, "terminating operations" means a closing of a 14retail operation that is directly related to the opening of 15the same operation or like retail entity owned or operated by 16more than 50% of the original ownership in a STAR bond district 17within one year before or after initiating operations in the 18STAR bond district, but it does not mean closing an operation 19for reasons beyond the control of the retail entity, as 20documented by the retail entity, subject to a reasonable 21finding by the municipality (or county if such retail 22operation is not located within a municipality) in which the 23terminated operations were located that the closed location 24contained inadequate space, had become economically obsolete, 25or was no longer a viable location for the retailer or 26serviceperson.  HB5556- 15 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "Political subdivision" means a municipality or county 2that undertakes to establish a STAR bond district under the 3provisions of this Act.4    "Professional sports" means any of the following sports at 5the major league level: baseball, basketball, football, or ice 6hockey.7    "Project costs" means the total of all costs incurred or 8estimated to be incurred on or after the date of establishment 9of a STAR bond district or, for a NOVA urban district, 10following the date of establishment or prior to the date of 11establishment of the STAR bond district as approved by the 12office of the Governor, that are reasonable or necessary to 13implement a STAR bond district plan or any STAR bond project 14plans, or both, including costs incurred for public 15improvements and private improvements that serve the public 16purposes set forth in Section 5-5 of this Act. "Project costs" 17includes, without limitation:18        (1) costs of studies, surveys, development of plans 19    and specifications, formation, implementation, and 20    administration of a STAR bond district, STAR bond district 21    plan, any STAR bond projects, or any STAR bond project 22    plans incurred before or after the establishment of the 23    STAR bond district, including, but not limited to, staff 24    and professional service costs for architectural, 25    engineering, development, legal, financial, planning, 26    marketing, operations, or other professional services;   HB5556- 16 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    however, no charges for professional services may be based 2    on a percentage of the tax increment collected, and no 3    contracts for professional services, excluding 4    architectural and engineering services, development and 5    finance services, and operations services, may be entered 6    into if the terms of the contract extend beyond a period of 7    3 years or, for a NOVA urban district, 7 years;8        (2) property assembly costs, including, but not 9    limited to, costs related to:10            (A) the acquisition of land and other real 11        property or rights or interests in the land or other 12        real property located within the boundaries of a STAR 13        bond district;14            (B) the demolition of buildings, site mobilization 15        and preparation, and site improvements that serve as 16        an engineered barrier addressing ground level or below 17        ground environmental contamination and remediation, 18        including, but not limited to, parking lots and other 19        concrete or asphalt barriers; and20            (C) the clearing and grading of land and the 21        importing of additional soil and fill materials or the 22        removal of soil and fill materials from the site;23        (3) subject to paragraph (6), the costs of buildings 24    and other vertical improvements that are located within 25    the boundaries of a STAR bond district and are owned by a 26    political subdivision or other public entity, including   HB5556- 17 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    without limitation police and fire stations, educational 2    facilities, and public restrooms and rest areas;3        (4) costs of buildings and other vertical improvements 4    that are located within: (i) the boundaries of a STAR bond 5    district and are owned by a development user, except that 6    only 4 development users, other than a hotel or 7    entertainment venue, in a STAR bond district and one hotel 8    are eligible to include the cost of those vertical 9    improvements as project costs, or (ii) the boundaries of a 10    NOVA district or a NOVA urban district;11        (5) costs of the following vertical improvements that 12    are located within (i) the boundaries of a STAR bond 13    district and owned by an entertainment venue, except that 14    only one entertainment venue in a STAR bond district is 15    eligible to include the cost of those vertical 16    improvements as project costs, or (ii) a NOVA district or 17    a NOVA urban district:18            (A) buildings;19            (B) rides and attractions, including, but not 20        limited to, carousels, slides, roller coasters, 21        displays, models, towers, works of art, and similar 22        theme and amusement park improvements; and23            (C) other vertical improvements;24        (6) costs of the design and construction of 25    infrastructure and public works located within the 26    boundaries of a STAR bond district that are reasonable or   HB5556- 18 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    necessary to implement a STAR bond district plan or any 2    STAR bond project plans, or both, except that "project 3    costs" does not include the cost of constructing a new 4    municipal public building principally used to provide 5    offices, storage space, or conference facilities or 6    vehicle storage, maintenance, or repair for 7    administrative, public safety, or public works personnel 8    and that is not intended to replace an existing public 9    building unless the political subdivision makes a 10    reasonable determination in a STAR bond district plan or 11    any STAR bond project plans, supported by information that 12    provides the basis for that determination, that the new 13    municipal building is required to meet an increase in the 14    need for public safety purposes anticipated to result from 15    the implementation of the STAR bond district plan or any 16    STAR bond project plans; provided, however, for a NOVA 17    urban district, this prohibition shall not apply to any 18    commuter rail or transit and transit-related facilities, 19    whether public or private; 20        (7) costs of the design and construction of the 21    following improvements located outside the boundaries of a 22    STAR bond district if the costs are essential to further 23    the purpose and development of a STAR bond district plan 24    and either (i) part of and connected to sewer, water, or 25    utility service lines and district energy and utility 26    distribution systems that physically connect to the STAR   HB5556- 19 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    bond district, or (ii) digital media, related 2    infrastructure, signage and interactive displays, or (iii) 3    significant improvements for adjacent off-site highways, 4    streets, roadways, railway and related transportation 5    systems, and interchanges that are approved by the 6    Department of Transportation. No other cost of 7    infrastructure and public works improvements located 8    outside the boundaries of a STAR bond district may be 9    deemed project costs;10        (8) costs of job training and retraining projects for 11    current and future employees of development users, 12    including programs implemented by businesses located 13    within a STAR bond district;14        (9) financing costs, including, but not limited to, 15    all necessary and incidental expenses related to the 16    issuance of obligations and the payment of interest on any 17    obligations issued under this Act, including interest 18    accruing during the estimated period of construction of 19    any improvements in a STAR bond district or any STAR bond 20    projects for which such obligations are issued and for not 21    exceeding 36 months thereafter or, for a NOVA urban 22    district, 60 months thereafter, and including reasonable 23    reserves related thereto;24        (10) interest costs incurred by a developer for 25    project costs related to the acquisition, formation, 26    implementation, development, construction, and   HB5556- 20 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    administration of a STAR bond district, STAR bond district 2    plan, STAR bond projects, or any STAR bond project plans 3    if:4            (A) except for a NOVA urban district, payment of 5        the costs in any one year may not exceed 30% of the 6        annual interest costs incurred by the developer with 7        regard to the STAR bond district or any STAR bond 8        projects during that year; and9            (B) except for a NOVA urban district, the total of 10        the interest payments paid under this Act may not 11        exceed 30% of the total cost paid or incurred by the 12        developer for a STAR bond district or STAR bond 13        projects, plus project costs, excluding any property 14        assembly costs incurred by a political subdivision 15        under this Act;16        (11) to the extent the political subdivision by 17    written agreement accepts and approves the same, all or a 18    portion of a taxing district's capital costs resulting 19    from a STAR bond district or STAR bond projects 20    necessarily incurred or to be incurred within a taxing 21    district in furtherance of the objectives of a STAR bond 22    district plan or STAR bond project plans;23        (12) costs of common areas located within the 24    boundaries of a STAR bond district;25        (13) costs of landscaping and plantings, retaining 26    walls and fences, artificial lakes and ponds, shelters,   HB5556- 21 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    benches, lighting, and similar amenities located within 2    the boundaries of a STAR bond district;3        (14) costs of mounted building signs, digital media, 4    site monuments, and pylon signs located within the 5    boundaries of a STAR bond district; or6        (15) if included in the STAR bond district plan and 7    approved in writing by the Director, salaries or a portion 8    of salaries for local government employees to the extent 9    the same are directly attributable to the work of those 10    employees on the establishment and management of a STAR 11    bond district or any STAR bond project.12    Except as specified in items (1) through (15) of this 13definition, "project costs" does not include:14        (A) the cost of construction of buildings that are 15    owned by a municipality or county and leased to a 16    development user for uses other than as a retail store, 17    hotel, or entertainment venue;18        (B) moving expenses for employees of the businesses 19    locating within the STAR bond district;20        (C) property taxes for property located in the STAR 21    bond district;22        (D) lobbying costs; and23        (E) general overhead or administrative costs of the 24    political subdivision that would still have been incurred 25    by the political subdivision if the political subdivision 26    had not established a STAR bond district.  HB5556- 22 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "Project development agreement" means any one or more 2agreements, including any amendments to that agreement or 3those agreements, between a master developer and any 4codeveloper or subdeveloper in connection with a STAR bond 5project, which project development agreement may include the 6political subdivision as a party.7    "Project labor agreement" means a prehire collective 8bargaining agreement that covers all terms and conditions of 9employment between the general contractor and all 10subcontractors hired by the master developer, developer, 11codeveloper, or subdeveloper, as applicable, of a STAR bond 12project. A "project labor agreement" must include the 13following provisions: (1) a provision establishing the minimum 14hourly wage for each class of labor organization employee; (2) 15a provision establishing the benefits and other compensation 16for each class of labor organization employee; (3) a provision 17requiring that no strike or dispute will be engaged in by the 18labor organization employees; (4) a provision requiring that 19no lockout or dispute will be engaged in by the general 20contractor and all subcontractors building the project; and 21(5) a provision establishing goals for apprenticeship hours to 22be performed by minority persons and women and goals for total 23hours to be performed by minority persons and women, as those 24terms are defined in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 25Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act. A "project labor 26agreement" may include other terms and conditions as   HB5556- 23 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1necessary.2    "Projected market area" means any area within the State in 3which a STAR bond district or STAR bond project is projected to 4have a significant fiscal or market impact as determined by 5the Director.6    "Resolution" means a resolution, order, ordinance, or 7other appropriate form of legislative action of a political 8subdivision or other applicable public entity approved by a 9vote of a majority of a quorum at a meeting of the governing 10body of the political subdivision or applicable public entity.11    "STAR bond" means a sales tax and revenue bond, note, or 12other obligation payable from pledged STAR revenues and issued 13by a political subdivision, the proceeds of which shall be 14used only to pay project costs as defined in this Act.15    "STAR bond district" means the specific area that is 16declared to be an eligible area by the political subdivision, 17that has received approval by the State, and in which the 18political subdivision may develop one or more STAR bond 19projects.20    "STAR bond district plan" means the preliminary or 21conceptual plan that generally identifies the proposed STAR 22bond project areas and identifies in a general manner the 23buildings, facilities, and improvements to be constructed or 24improved in each STAR bond project area or, for a NOVA urban 25district, the STAR bond district plan may also include a 26specific STAR bond project.  HB5556- 24 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "STAR bond project" means a project that is located within 2a STAR bond district and that is approved under Section 5-30.3    "STAR bond project area" means the geographic area within 4a STAR bond district in which there may be one or more STAR 5bond projects.6    "STAR bond project plan" means the written plan adopted by 7a political subdivision for the development of a STAR bond 8project in a STAR bond district; the plan may include, but is 9not limited to, (i) project costs incurred prior to the date of 10the STAR bond project plan and estimated future STAR bond 11project costs, (ii) proposed sources of funds to pay those 12costs, (iii) the nature and estimated term of any obligations 13to be issued by the political subdivision to pay those costs, 14(iv) the most recent equalized assessed valuation of the STAR 15bond project area, (v) an estimate of the equalized assessed 16valuation of the STAR bond district or applicable project area 17after completion of a STAR bond project, (vi) a general 18description of the types of any known or proposed developers 19or development , users, or tenants of the STAR bond project or 20projects included in the plan, (vii) a general description of 21the type, structure, and character of the property or 22facilities to be developed or improved, (viii) a description 23of the general land uses to apply to the STAR bond project, and 24(ix) a general description or an estimate of the type, class, 25and number of employees to be employed in the operation of the 26STAR bond project.  HB5556- 25 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "State sales tax" means all the net revenue realized under 2the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 3Service Use Tax Act, and the Service Occupation Tax Act from 4transactions at places of business located within a STAR bond 5district, excluding that portion of the net revenue realized 6under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 7Service Use Tax Act, and the Service Occupation Tax Act from 8transactions at places of business located within a STAR bond 9district that is deposited into the Local Government Tax Fund 10and the County and Mass Transit District Fund.11    "State sales tax increment" means:12        (1) with respect to all STAR bond districts that do 13    not qualify as NOVA districts or NOVA urban districts:14            (A) 100% of that portion of the aggregate State 15        sales tax that is in excess of the aggregate State 16        sales tax for the same month in the base year, as 17        determined by the Department of Revenue, from 18        transactions at up to 4 development users located 19        within a STAR bond district, which development users 20        shall be designated by the master developer and 21        approved by the political subdivision and the Director 22        of Revenue in conjunction with the applicable STAR 23        bond project approval; and24            (B) 25% of that portion of the aggregate State 25        sales tax that is in excess of the aggregate State 26        sales tax for the same month in the base year, as   HB5556- 26 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1        determined by the Department of Revenue from all other 2        transactions within a STAR bond district; and3        (2) with respect to all NOVA districts:4            (A) 100% of that portion of the State sales tax 5        that is in excess of the State sales tax for the same 6        month in the base year, as determined by the 7        Department of Revenue, from transactions at up to 4 8        development users located, which development users 9        shall be designated by the master developer and 10        approved by the political subdivision and the Director 11        of Revenue in conjunction with the applicable STAR 12        bond project approval; and 13            (B) 50% of that portion of the State sales tax that 14        is in excess of the State sales tax for the same month 15        in the base year from all other transactions within 16        the NOVA district; and .17        (3) with respect to all NOVA urban districts, 100% of 18    that portion of the State sales tax that is in excess of 19    the State sales tax for the same month in the base year, as 20    determined by the Department of Revenue, from all 21    transactions within the NOVA urban district. 22    "Substantial change" means a change in which the proposed 23STAR bond project plan differs substantially in size, scope, 24or use from the approved STAR bond district plan or STAR bond 25project plan.26    "Taxpayer" means an individual, partnership, corporation,   HB5556- 27 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1limited liability company, trust, estate, or other entity that 2is subject to the Illinois Income Tax Act.3    "Total development costs" means the aggregate public and 4private investment in a STAR bond district, including project 5costs and other direct and indirect costs related to the 6development of the STAR bond district over the life of the STAR 7bond district.8    "Underserved area" has the meaning given to that term in 9Section 5-5 of the Economic Development for a Growing Economy 10Tax Credit Act.11    "Vacant" means that portion of the land in a proposed STAR 12bond district that is not occupied by a building, facility, or 13other vertical improvement.14(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 15    (50 ILCS 475/5-15)16    Sec. 5-15. Limitations on STAR bond districts and STAR 17bond projects. The Office of the Governor, in consultation 18with the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the 19Governor's Office of Management and Budget, shall have final 20approval of all STAR bond districts and STAR bond projects 21established under this Act, which may be established 22throughout the 10 Economic Development Regions in the State as 23established by the Department. Regardless of the number of 24STAR bond districts established within any Economic 25Development Region: (i) only one STAR bond project may be   HB5556- 28 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1approved for each Economic Development Region having a 2population of less than 600,000; (ii) up to 3 STAR bond 3projects may be approved for each Economic Development Region 4having a population of between 600,000 and 999,999; and (iii) 5up to 4 STAR bond projects may be approved for each Economic 6Development Region having a population of 1,000,000 or more, 7excluding projects located in STAR bond districts established 8under the Innovation Development and Economy Act. Other than a 9NOVA urban district, a A STAR bond district under this Act may 10not be located either entirely or partially inside of a 11municipality with a population in excess of 2,000,000.12    A STAR bond project that is not located in a NOVA district 13may not receive reimbursement from the proceeds of bonds 14secured by State sales tax increment that exceeds the lesser 15of (1) 50% of the total development costs or (2) an aggregate 16amount of $75,000,000. A STAR bond project that is located in a 17NOVA district may not receive reimbursement from the proceeds 18of bonds secured by State sales tax increment that exceeds the 19lesser of (1) 50% of the total development costs or (2) an 20aggregate amount of $800,000,000. A STAR bond project that is 21located in a NOVA urban district may not receive reimbursement 22from the proceeds of bonds secured by State sales tax 23increment that exceeds the lesser of (1) 75% of the total 24development costs or (2) an aggregate amount of 25$1,600,000,000. 26(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.)   HB5556- 29 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    (50 ILCS 475/5-20)2    Sec. 5-20. Establishment of STAR bond district. 3    (a) The corporate authorities of a municipality may 4establish a STAR bond district within an eligible area within 5the municipality or partially outside the boundaries of the 6municipality in an unincorporated area of the county. A STAR 7bond district that is partially outside the boundaries of the 8municipality must also be approved by the corporate 9authorities of the county by the passage of a resolution. The 10corporate authorities of a county may establish a STAR bond 11district in an eligible area in any unincorporated area of the 12county.13    (b) When a political subdivision is interested in 14establishing a STAR bond district, the political subdivision 15must first provide notice to the Director of Commerce and 16Economic Opportunity and the Director of Revenue on or before 17June 1, 2026 of its intention to establish a STAR bond 18district. After filing notice, the political subdivision shall 19determine whether the area satisfies the statutory criteria to 20establish a STAR bond district consistent with this Act. The 21corporate authorities of the political subdivision shall adopt 22a resolution stating that the political subdivision is 23considering the establishment of a STAR bond district. The 24resolution shall:25        (1) give notice, in the same manner as set forth in   HB5556- 30 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    subsection (e) of Section 5-30, that a public hearing will 2    be held to consider the establishment of a STAR bond 3    district and fix the date, hour, and place of the public 4    hearing, which shall be at a location that is within 20 5    miles of the STAR bond district, in a facility that can 6    accommodate a large crowd, and in a facility that is 7    accessible to persons with disabilities;8        (2) describe the proposed general boundaries of the 9    STAR bond district;10        (3) describe the STAR bond district plan;11        (4) require that a description and map of the proposed 12    STAR bond district are available for inspection at a time 13    and place designated;14        (5) identify the master developer for the STAR bond 15    district; and16        (6) require that the corporate authorities consider 17    findings necessary for the establishment of a STAR bond 18    district.19    (c) Upon the conclusion of the public hearing the 20corporate authorities of the political subdivision may adopt a 21resolution to establish the STAR bond district. The corporate 22authorities of a municipality with a population of 2,000,000 23or more may proceed directly to consider a resolution to 24establish a NOVA urban district. 25        (1) A resolution to establish a STAR bond district 26    shall:  HB5556- 31 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1            (A) make findings that the proposed STAR bond 2        district is to be developed with a STAR bond project;3            (B) make findings that the STAR bond district is 4        an eligible area;5            (C) contain a STAR bond district plan that 6        identifies in a general manner the buildings and 7        facilities that are proposed to be constructed or 8        improved as part of the STAR bond project and that 9        includes plans for at least one development user;10            (D) contain the legal description of the STAR bond 11        district;12            (E) appoint the master developer for the STAR bond 13        district, subject to the provisions of Section 5-25, 14        and, if applicable, verify that master developer has a 15        signed project labor agreement for the construction of 16        future improvements within any STAR bond projects;17            (F) if applicable, make a finding that the STAR 18        bond district plan demonstrates a reasonable 19        expectation that it will meet the acreage, capital 20        investment, sales, and job creation thresholds 21        necessary to qualify as a NOVA district or NOVA urban 22        district and contains a request for a NOVA district 23        designation or NOVA urban district; and24            (G) establish the STAR bond district, contingent 25        upon approval of the State as set forth in subsection 26        (e).  HB5556- 32 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1        (2) For STAR bond districts other than a NOVA urban 2    district, if If the resolution to establish a STAR bond 3    district is not adopted by the political subdivision 4    within 60 days after the conclusion of the public hearing, 5    then the STAR bond district shall not be established.6        (3) Upon adoption of a resolution to establish a STAR 7    bond district, the political subdivision shall send a 8    certified copy of the resolution to the Director of 9    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Director of 10    Revenue, and the Director of the Governor's Office of 11    Management and Budget within 60 days after the adoption of 12    the resolution.13    (d) Upon adoption of a resolution to establish a STAR bond 14district, the STAR bond district and any STAR bond project 15shall be governed by a master development agreement between 16the political subdivision and the master developer. A STAR 17bond district that is partially outside the boundaries of a 18municipality shall require only one master development 19agreement, which shall be between the municipality and the 20master developer. In no event shall there be more than one 21master development agreement governing the terms and 22conditions of a STAR bond district. The master development 23agreement shall require the master developer to ensure 24compliance with the following requirements to reduce the 25ecological impact of the STAR bond district development: (i) 26inclusion of pollution prevention, erosion, and sedimentation   HB5556- 33 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1control plans during construction; (ii) protection of 2endangered species' habitat and wetlands mitigation; (iii) 3preservation of at least 20% of the STAR bond district as green 4space, including lawns, parks, landscaped areas, paths, lakes, 5ponds, and other water features or, for a NOVA urban district, 6inclusion of such green space, including lawns, parks, 7landscaped areas, paths, lakes, ponds, and other water 8features, as set forth in the STAR bond project plan; (iv) 9promotion of the use of renewable energy to the extent 10commercially feasible; (v) implementation of recycling 11programs during construction and at completed STAR bond 12projects; (vi) preservation of water quality and promotion of 13water conservation through the use of techniques such as 14reusing storm water and landscaping with native and 15low-maintenance vegetation to reduce the need for irrigation 16and fertilization; (vii) inclusion of comprehensive lighting 17programs that reduce light pollution within the STAR bond 18district; and (viii) promotion of shared parking between 19different users and the political subdivision to reduce the 20impact on project sites.21    (e) Upon adoption of a resolution to establish a STAR bond 22district, the political subdivision shall submit the proposed 23STAR bond district plan to the Department, the Department of 24Revenue, and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 25for consideration. All proposed STAR bond district plans must 26be submitted on or before January 1, 2027 for consideration.   HB5556- 34 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1The Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 2Office of Management and Budget shall make a joint 3recommendation to approve a STAR bond district if the agencies 4find that: (i) the proposed STAR bond district is an eligible 5area; (ii) the STAR bond district plan includes a STAR bond 6project that would entail a projected capital investment of at 7least $30,000,000 for a STAR bond district that is not 8proposed to be designated as a NOVA district, or $500,000,000 9for a STAR bond district that is proposed to be designated as a 10NOVA district, or $1,000,000,000 for a STAR bond district that 11is proposed to be designated as a NOVA urban district; (iii) 12the STAR bond district plan includes a STAR bond project that 13is reasonably projected to produce at least $60,000,000 of 14annual gross sales and at least 300 new jobs or, for a STAR 15bond district proposed to be designated as a NOVA district, at 16least $300,000,000 of annual gross sales and 1,500 new jobs 17or, for a STAR bond district proposed to be designated as a 18NOVA urban district, at least $450,000,000 of annual gross 19sales and 3,000 new jobs; (iv) the STAR bond district plan 20includes potential development users; (v) the creation of the 21STAR bond district and STAR bond district plan are in 22accordance with the purpose of this Act and the public 23interest; and (vi) the STAR bond district and STAR bond 24district plan meet any other requirement that the State deems 25appropriate. The agencies shall send a copy of their written 26findings and recommendation for approval or denial of a STAR   HB5556- 35 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1bond district to the Office of the Governor for review and 2final action. In the case of any NOVA district or NOVA urban 3district, those written findings and recommendations shall be 4submitted to the Office of the Governor within 60 days 5following the agencies' receipt of the District Plan proposing 6the NOVA district or NOVA urban district.7    (f) Upon receipt of the written findings and 8recommendations, the Office of the Governor shall review the 9submission and issue a final approval or denial of the STAR 10bond district and send written notice of its approval or 11denial to the requesting political subdivision and to the 12agencies. If requested by the political subdivision under 13paragraph (F) of subsection (c) of this Section, the written 14notice shall also include a determination as to whether the 15proposed STAR bond district qualifies for designation as a 16NOVA district or NOVA urban district and shall be issued 17within 30 days after the Office of the Governor receives the 18written findings of the agencies as provided in subsection 19(e).20    (g) Starting on the fifth anniversary of the first date of 21distribution of State sales tax increment from the approved 22STAR bond project in the STAR bond district, or, if the project 23is in a NOVA district, the earlier of (i) the fifteenth 24anniversary of that date or (ii) the date requested by the 25master developer, and continuing each anniversary thereafter, 26the Director shall, in consultation with the political   HB5556- 36 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1subdivision and the master developer, determine the total 2number of new jobs created within the STAR bond district, the 3total development cost to date, and the master developer's 4compliance with its obligations under any written agreements 5with the State. If, on the fifth anniversary of the first date 6of distribution of State sales tax increment from the approved 7STAR bond project in the STAR bond district, or the earlier of 8(i) the fifteenth anniversary of that date or (ii) the date 9requested by the master developer if the project is in a NOVA 10district or NOVA urban district, the Director determines that 11the total development cost to date is not equal to or greater 12than (i) $30,000,000 if the project is not in a NOVA district 13or NOVA urban district, (ii) $500,000,000 if the project is in 14a NOVA district, or (iii) $1,000,000,000 if the project is in a 15NOVA urban district, or that the master developer is in breach 16of any written agreement with the State, then no new STAR bonds 17may be issued in the STAR bond district until the total 18development cost exceeds $30,000,000, or $500,000,000, or 19$1,000,000,000, as applicable, or the breach of agreement is 20cured, or both. If, on the fifth anniversary of the first date 21of distribution of State sales tax increment from the approved 22STAR bond project in the STAR bond district, or the earlier of 23(i) the fifteenth anniversary of that date or (ii) the date 24requested by the master developer if the project is in a NOVA 25district or a NOVA urban district, there are not at least (i) 26300 new jobs existing in the STAR bond district if the project   HB5556- 37 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1is not in a NOVA district or a NOVA urban district, (ii) 1,500 2new jobs existing in the STAR bond district if the project is 3in a NOVA district, or (iii) 3,000 new jobs existing in the 4STAR bond district if the project is in a NOVA urban district, 5the State may require the master developer to pay the State a 6penalty of $1,500 per job under 300, or 1,500, or 3,000, as 7applicable, each year until the earlier of (i) the 8twenty-third anniversary of the first date of distribution of 9State sales tax increment from the approved STAR bond project 10in the STAR bond district, (ii) the date that all STAR bonds 11issued in the STAR bond district have been paid off, or (iii) 12the date on which at least 300 jobs, or 1,500 jobs, or 3,000 13jobs, as applicable, have been created in the STAR bond 14district. Upon creation of 300 jobs, or 1,500 jobs, or 3,000 15jobs, as applicable, in the STAR bond district, there shall 16not be an ongoing obligation to maintain those jobs after the 17fifth anniversary of the first date of distribution of State 18sales tax increment from the approved STAR bond project in the 19STAR bond district, and the master developer shall be relieved 20of any liability with respect to job creation under this 21subsection. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 22subsection, the master developer shall not be liable for the 23penalties set forth in this subsection if the breach of 24agreement, failure to reach the required amount in total 25development costs, or failure to create the required number of 26jobs is due to delays caused by force majeure, as that term is   HB5556- 38 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1defined in the master development agreement.2(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 3    (50 ILCS 475/5-30)4    Sec. 5-30. Approval of STAR bond projects. 5    (a) The corporate authorities of a political subdivision 6seeking to establish a STAR bond project in an approved STAR 7bond district must submit a proposed STAR bond project plan to 8the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 9Office of Management and Budget on or before June 1, 2028. A 10STAR bond project plan for a NOVA urban district may be 11submitted to the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 13Office of Management and Budget concurrent with the process 14for approval of a STAR bond district in Section 5-20 of this 15Act. A STAR bond project which is partially outside the 16boundaries of a municipality must also be approved by the 17corporate authorities of the county by resolution.18    After the establishment of a STAR bond district, the 19master developer may propose a STAR bond project to a 20political subdivision, and the master developer shall, in 21cooperation with the political subdivision, prepare a STAR 22bond project plan in consultation with the planning commission 23of the political subdivision, if any. The STAR bond project 24plan may be implemented in separate development stages.25    (b) Any political subdivision considering a STAR bond   HB5556- 39 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1project within a STAR bond district shall cause to be prepared 2an independent feasibility study. The feasibility study shall 3be prepared by a feasibility consultant approved by the 4Department. The feasibility consultant shall provide certified 5copies of the feasibility study to the political subdivision, 6the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 7Office of Management and Budget. The feasibility study shall 8include the following:9        (1) the estimated amount of pledged STAR revenues 10    expected to be collected in each year through the maturity 11    date of the proposed STAR bonds;12        (2) a statement of how the jobs and taxes obtained 13    from the STAR bond project will contribute significantly 14    to the economic development of the State and region;15        (3) visitation expectations;16        (4) the unique quality of the project;17        (5) an economic impact study;18        (6) a market study;19        (7) current and anticipated infrastructure analysis;20        (8) integration and collaboration with other resources 21    or businesses;22        (9) the quality of service and experience provided, as 23    measured against national consumer standards for the 24    specific target market;25        (10) project accountability, measured according to 26    best industry practices;  HB5556- 40 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1        (11) the expected return on State and local investment 2    that the STAR bond project is anticipated to produce; and3        (12) an anticipated principal and interest payment 4    schedule on the STAR bonds.5    The feasibility consultant, along with any other 6consultants commissioned to perform the studies and other 7analysis required by the feasibility study, shall be selected 8by the political subdivision but approved by the Department. 9The consultants shall be retained by the political 10subdivision. The political subdivision may seek reimbursement 11from the master developer.12    The failure to include all information enumerated in this 13subsection in the feasibility study for a STAR bond project 14shall not affect the validity of STAR bonds issued under this 15Act. A feasibility study for a NOVA urban district completed 16for the Office of the Governor and the Department of Commerce 17and Economic Opportunity within 12 months after the effective 18date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 19shall meet the requirements of this Section. 20    (c) If the political subdivision determines the STAR bond 21project is feasible, the STAR bond project plan shall include:22        (1) a summary of the feasibility study;23        (2) a reference to the STAR bond district plan that 24    identifies the STAR bond project area that is set forth in 25    the STAR bond project plan that is being considered;26        (3) a legal description and map of the STAR bond   HB5556- 41 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    project area to be developed or redeveloped;2        (4) a description of the buildings and facilities 3    proposed to be constructed or improved in the STAR bond 4    project area, including development users, as applicable;5        (5) a copy of letters of intent to locate within the 6    STAR bond district signed by both the master developer and 7    the appropriate corporate officer of at least one 8    development user for the STAR bond project proposed within 9    the district; 10        (6) a copy of a project labor agreement entered into 11    by the master developer and a commitment by the master 12    developer, other developers, contractors, and 13    subcontractors to comply with the requirements of Section 14    30-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code as they apply to 15    responsible bidders; and16        (7) any other information the corporate authorities of 17    the political subdivision deems reasonable and necessary 18    to advise the public of the intent of the STAR bond project 19    plan.20    (d) Before a political subdivision may hold a public 21hearing to consider a STAR bond project plan, the political 22subdivision must apply to the Department, the Department of 23Revenue, and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 24for joint review and recommendation and ultimate approval or 25denial by the Office of the Governor of the STAR bond project 26plan. The corporate authorities of a political subdivision   HB5556- 42 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1seeking to establish a STAR bond project in an approved STAR 2bond district must submit a proposed STAR bond project plan to 3the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 4Office of Management and Budget by June 1, 2028 for 5consideration.6    An application for approval of a STAR bond project plan 7must not be approved by the State unless all the components of 8the feasibility study set forth in paragraphs (1) through (12) 9of subsection (b) have been completed and submitted for review 10and recommendation for approval or denial. In addition to 11reviewing all the other elements of the STAR bond project plan 12required under subsection (c), which must be included in the 13application and include a letter of intent as required under 14paragraph (5) of subsection (c) in order to receive State 15approval, the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the 16Governor's Office of Management and Budget must review the 17feasibility study and consider all the components of the 18feasibility study set forth in paragraphs (1) through (12) of 19subsection (b), including, without limitation, the economic 20impact study and the financial benefit of the proposed STAR 21bond project to the local, regional, and State economies, the 22proposed adverse impacts on similar businesses and projects as 23well as municipalities within the market area, and the net 24effect of the proposed STAR bond project on the local, 25regional, and State economies. In addition to the economic 26impact study, the political subdivision must also submit to   HB5556- 43 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1the agencies, as part of its application, the financial and 2other information that substantiates the basis for the 3conclusion of the economic impact study, in the form and 4manner as required by the agencies, so that the agencies can 5verify the results of the study. In addition to any other 6criteria in this subsection, the State may not approve the 7STAR bond project plan unless the agencies are satisfied that 8the proposed development users are, in fact, true development 9users and find that the STAR bond project plan is in accordance 10with the purpose of this Act and the public interest. As part 11of the review, the agencies shall evaluate the conclusions of 12the feasibility study as it relates to the projected State and 13local sales tax increments expected to be generated in the 14STAR bond district. The Department, the Department of Revenue, 15and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall 16jointly recommend the approval of a STAR bond project plan. In 17making the recommendation, the agencies shall consider the 18proximity of a proposed STAR bond project to another proposed 19or existing STAR bond project. Notwithstanding any other 20provision of this Act, the Department, the Department of 21Revenue, and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 22shall not approve any STAR bond project plan that includes as 23part of the plan the development of any facility, stadium, 24arena, or other structure if: (1) the purpose of the facility, 25stadium, arena, or other structure is the holding of 26professional sports contests; or (2) the facility, stadium,   HB5556- 44 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1arena, or other structure is within a one-mile radius of any 2structure that is developed on or after the effective date of 3this Act and has as one of its purposes the holding of 4professional sports contests except, in respect of a STAR bond 5project in a NOVA urban district, for a structure that is 6within a one-mile radius of an existing stadium that may be 7redeveloped on or after the effective date of this Act and has 8as one of its purposes the holding of professional sports 9contests. The agencies shall send a copy of their written 10findings and recommended approval or denial of the STAR bond 11project plan to the Office of the Governor for final action. 12Upon receipt of the Director's written findings and 13recommendation, the Office of the Governor shall issue a final 14approval or denial of the STAR bond project plan based on the 15criteria in this subsection and Section 5-15 and send a 16written approval or denial to the requesting political 17subdivision. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for 18STAR bond districts designated as NOVA districts or NOVA urban 19districts, the Office of the Governor shall issue a final 20approval or denial of the STAR bond project plan based on the 21criteria in this subsection and Section 5-15 and send written 22approval or denial to the requesting political subdivision 23within 180 days or, for a NOVA urban district, 60 days, after 24the political subdivision applies for approval, as set out in 25this subsection (d). In granting its approval, the Office of 26the Governor may require the political subdivision to execute   HB5556- 45 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1a binding agreement or memorandum of understanding with the 2State. The terms of the agreement or memorandum may include, 3among other things, the political subdivision's repayment of 4the State sales tax increment distributed to it if any 5violation of the agreement or memorandum or this Act occurs.6    (e) Upon a finding by the planning and zoning commission 7of the political subdivision, if any, that the STAR bond 8project plan is consistent with the intent of the 9comprehensive plan for the development of the political 10subdivision and upon issuance of written approval of the STAR 11bond project plan from the Office of the Governor under 12subsection (d) of this Section, the corporate authorities of 13the political subdivision shall adopt a resolution stating 14that the political subdivision is considering the adoption of 15the STAR bond project plan. The resolution shall:16        (1) give notice that a public hearing will be held to 17    consider the adoption of the STAR bond project plan and 18    fix the date, hour, and place of the public hearing;19        (2) describe the general boundaries of the STAR bond 20    district within which the STAR bond project will be 21    located and the date of establishment of the STAR bond 22    district;23        (3) describe the general boundaries of the area 24    proposed to be included within the STAR bond project area;25        (4) provide that the STAR bond project plan and map of 26    the area to be redeveloped or developed are available for   HB5556- 46 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    inspection during regular office hours in the offices of 2    the political subdivision; and3        (5) contain a summary of the terms and conditions of 4    any proposed project development agreement with the 5    political subdivision.6    (f) A public hearing shall be conducted to consider the 7adoption of any STAR bond project plan.8        (1) The date fixed for the public hearing to consider 9    the adoption of the STAR bond project plan shall be not 10    less than 20 nor more than 90 days following the date of 11    the adoption of the resolution fixing the date of the 12    hearing.13        (2) A copy of the political subdivision's resolution 14    providing for the public hearing shall be sent by 15    certified mail, return receipt requested, to the corporate 16    authorities of the county. A copy of the political 17    subdivision's resolution providing for the public hearing 18    shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, 19    to each person or persons in whose name the general taxes 20    for the last preceding year were paid on each parcel of 21    land lying within the proposed STAR bond project area 22    within 10 days following the date of the adoption of the 23    resolution. The resolution shall be published once in a 24    newspaper of general circulation in the political 25    subdivision not less than one week nor more than 3 weeks 26    before the date fixed for the public hearing. A map or   HB5556- 47 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    aerial photo clearly delineating the area of land proposed 2    to be included within the STAR bond project area shall be 3    published with the resolution.4        (3) The hearing shall be held at a location that is 5    within 20 miles of the STAR bond district or, for a NOVA 6    urban district, within 2 miles of the STAR bond district, 7    in a facility that can accommodate a large crowd is 8    accessible to persons with disabilities.9        (4) At the public hearing, a representative of the 10    political subdivision or master developer shall present 11    the STAR bond project plan. Following the presentation of 12    the STAR bond project plan, all interested persons shall 13    be given an opportunity to be heard. The corporate 14    authorities may continue the date and time of the public 15    hearing.16    (g) Upon conclusion of the public hearing, the governing 17body of the political subdivision may adopt the STAR bond 18project plan by a resolution approving the STAR bond project 19plan.20    (h) After the adoption by the corporate authorities of the 21political subdivision of a STAR bond project plan, the 22political subdivision may enter into a project development 23agreement if the master developer has requested the political 24subdivision to be a party to the project development agreement 25under subsection (b) of Section 5-40.26    (i) Within 30 days after the adoption by the political   HB5556- 48 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1subdivision of a STAR bond project plan, the clerk of the 2political subdivision shall transmit a copy of the legal 3description of the land and a list of all new and existing 4mailing addresses within the STAR bond district, a copy of the 5resolution adopting the STAR bond project plan, and a map or 6plat indicating the boundaries of the STAR bond project area 7and STAR bond district to the clerk, treasurer, and governing 8body of the county and to the Department and Department of 9Revenue. Within 30 days of creation of any new mailing address 10within a STAR bond district, the clerk of the political 11subdivision shall provide written notice of that new address 12to the Department and the Department of Revenue.13     If a certified copy of the resolution adopting the STAR 14bond project plan is filed with the Department of Revenue on or 15before the first day of April, the Department of Revenue, if 16all other requirements of this subsection are met, shall 17proceed to collect and allocate any local sales tax increment 18and any State sales tax increment in accordance with the 19provisions of this Act on the first day of July next following 20the adoption and filing. If a certified copy of the resolution 21adopting the STAR bond project plan is filed with the 22Department of Revenue after April 1 but on or before the first 23day of October, the Department of Revenue, if all other 24requirements of this subsection are met, shall proceed to 25collect and allocate any local sales tax increment and any 26State sales tax increment in accordance with the provisions of   HB5556- 49 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1this Act as of the first day of January next following the 2adoption and filing.3    Any substantial changes to a STAR bond project plan as 4adopted shall be subject to a public hearing following 5publication of notice thereof in a newspaper of general 6circulation in the political subdivision and approval by 7resolution of the governing body of the political subdivision.8    The Department of Revenue shall not collect or allocate 9any local sales tax increment or State sales tax increment 10until the political subdivision also provides, in the manner 11prescribed by the Department of Revenue, the boundaries of the 12STAR bond district and each address in the STAR bond district 13in such a way that the Department of Revenue can determine by 14its address whether a business is located in the STAR bond 15district. The political subdivision must provide this boundary 16and address information to the Department of Revenue, with a 17copy to the Department, on or before April 1 for 18administration and enforcement under this Act by the 19Department of Revenue beginning on the following July 1 and on 20or before October 1 for administration and enforcement under 21this Act by the Department of Revenue beginning on the 22following January 1. The Department of Revenue shall not 23administer or enforce any change made to the boundaries of a 24STAR bond district or any address change, addition, or 25deletion until the political subdivision reports the boundary 26change or address change, addition, or deletion to the   HB5556- 50 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1Department of Revenue, with a copy to the Department, in the 2manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue. The political 3subdivision must provide this boundary change or address 4change, addition, or deletion information to the Department of 5Revenue, with a copy to the Department, on or before April 1 6for administration and enforcement by the Department of 7Revenue of the change, addition, or deletion beginning on the 8following July 1 and on or before October 1 for administration 9and enforcement by the Department of Revenue of the change, 10addition, or deletion beginning on the following January 1. If 11a retailer is incorrectly included or excluded from the list 12of those located in the STAR bond district, the Department of 13Revenue shall be held harmless if the Department reasonably 14relied on information provided by the political subdivision.15    (j) Any STAR bond project must be approved by the 16political subdivision within 23 years after the date of the 17approval of the STAR bond district; however, any amendments to 18the STAR bond project may occur following that date.19    (k) Any developer of a STAR bond project shall commence 20work on the STAR bond project within 3 years from the date of 21adoption of the STAR bond project plan. If the developer fails 22to commence work on the STAR bond project within the 3-year 23period, funding for the project shall cease and the developer 24of the project or complex shall have one year to appeal to the 25political subdivision for a one-time reapproval of the project 26and funding. If the project is reapproved, the 3-year period   HB5556- 51 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1for commencement shall begin again on the date of the 2reapproval. If the project is not reapproved or if the 3developer again fails to commence work on the STAR bond 4project within the second 3-year period, the project shall be 5terminated, and the Department may accept applications for a 6new STAR bond project in the Economic Development Region.7    (l) After the adoption of a STAR bond project plan by the 8corporate authorities of the political subdivision and 9approval by the Office of the Governor under subsection (d), 10the political subdivision may authorize the issuance of STAR 11bonds in one or more series to finance the STAR bond project or 12pay or reimburse any eligible project cost within the STAR 13bond district in accordance with the provisions of this Act.14    (m) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (n), the 15maximum maturity of STAR bonds issued to finance a STAR bond 16project shall not exceed 23 years from the first date of 17distribution of State sales tax increment from the STAR bond 18project to the political subdivision unless the political 19subdivision extends that maturity by resolution up to a 20maximum of 35 years from such first distribution date. Any 21such extension shall require the approval of the Office of the 22Governor, upon the recommendation of the Directors. In no 23event shall the maximum maturity date for any STAR bonds 24exceed that date which is 35 years from the first distribution 25date of the first STAR bonds issued in a STAR bond district.26    (n) The maximum maturity of STAR bonds issued to finance a   HB5556- 52 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1STAR bond project located within a NOVA district or a NOVA 2urban district shall not exceed 35 years from the first date of 3distribution of State sales tax increment from the STAR bond 4project to the political subdivision.5(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 6    (50 ILCS 475/5-35)7    Sec. 5-35. Approval of STAR bond projects in NOVA 8districts and NOVA urban districts. Notwithstanding any other 9provision of this Act, a STAR bond project may be approved 10within each STAR bond district designated as a NOVA district 11or a NOVA urban district. Except as otherwise provided in this 12Act, approval of a NOVA district or a NOVA urban district shall 13follow the same procedures applicable to STAR bond district 14approval as provided in Section 5-20, and that designation 15shall be determined by the Office of the Governor during the 16STAR bond district approval process. The NOVA district or NOVA 17urban district must satisfy the criteria set forth to be 18considered a NOVA district or NOVA urban district, as 19applicable, under Section 5-10. Except as otherwise provided 20in this Act, establishment of a NOVA district or NOVA urban 21district shall be construed to have the same application and 22effect as a STAR bond district.23(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 24    (50 ILCS 475/5-45)  HB5556- 53 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    Sec. 5-45. STAR bonds; source of payment. 2    (a) Any political subdivision shall have the power to 3issue STAR bonds in one or more series to finance the 4undertaking of any STAR bond project in accordance with the 5provisions of this Act and the Omnibus Bond Acts. Any STAR bond 6project approved under this Act may be completed in one or more 7phases, and STAR bonds may be issued, in one or more series, to 8finance any STAR bond project or phase thereof. STAR bonds may 9be issued as revenue bonds, alternate bonds, or general 10obligation bonds as defined in and subject to the procedures 11provided in the Local Government Debt Reform Act.12    STAR bonds may be made payable, both as to principal and 13interest, from the following revenues, which, to the extent 14pledged by each respective political subdivision or other 15public entity for that purpose, shall constitute pledged STAR 16revenues:17        (1) revenues of the political subdivision derived from 18    or held in connection with the undertaking and carrying 19    out of any STAR bond project or projects under this Act;20        (2) available private funds and contributions, grants, 21    tax credits, or other financial assistance from the State 22    or federal government;23        (3) any taxes created under Section 5-50 and 24    designated as pledged STAR revenues by the political 25    subdivision;26        (4) all the local sales tax increment of a   HB5556- 54 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    municipality, county, or other unit of local government, 2    including an amount equal to the sales tax increment that 3    is received by a municipality from a sales tax 4    securitization corporation based on sales of revenues as 5    of the date of this Act, which amount shall be pledged as a 6    first lien on such receipts;7        (5) any special service area taxes collected within 8    the STAR bond district under the Special Service Area Tax 9    Act, which may be used for the purposes of funding project 10    costs or paying debt service on STAR bonds in addition to 11    the purposes contained in the special service area plan;12        (6) all the State sales tax increment;13        (7) any other revenues appropriated by the political 14    subdivision; and15        (8) any combination of these methods.16    (b) The political subdivision may pledge the pledged STAR 17revenues to the repayment of STAR bonds before, simultaneously 18with, or after the issuance of the STAR bonds.19    (c) Bonds issued as revenue bonds shall not be general 20obligations of the political subdivision, nor, in any event, 21shall they give rise to a charge against the political 22subdivision's general credit or taxing powers or be payable 23out of any funds or properties other than those set forth in 24subsection (a). The bonds shall so state on their face.25    (d) For each STAR bond project financed with STAR bonds 26payable from the pledged STAR revenues, the political   HB5556- 55 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1subdivision shall prepare and submit to the Department, the 2Department of Revenue, the Office of the Governor, and the 3Governor's Office of Management and Budget by June 1 of each 4year a report describing the status of the STAR bond project, 5any expenditures of the proceeds of STAR bonds that have 6occurred for the preceding calendar year, and any expenditures 7of the proceeds of the bonds expected to occur in the future, 8including the amount of pledged STAR revenue, the amount of 9revenue that has been spent, the projected amount of the 10revenue, and the anticipated use of the revenue. Each annual 11report shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the master 12developer certifying the contents of the report as true to the 13best of the master developer's knowledge. The Department shall 14have the right, but not the obligation, to request the Auditor 15General to review the annual report and the political 16subdivision's records containing the source information for 17the report for the purpose of verifying the report's contents. 18If the Auditor General declines the request for review, the 19Department shall have the right to select an independent 20third-party auditor to conduct an audit of the annual report 21and the political subdivision's records containing the source 22information for the report. The reasonable cost of the audit 23shall be paid by the master developer. The master development 24agreement shall grant the Department and the Auditor General 25the right to review the records of the political subdivision 26containing the source information for the report.  HB5556- 56 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    (e) As soon as possible after the first day of each month, 2upon certification of the Department of Revenue, the 3Comptroller shall order transferred and the Treasurer shall 4transfer, from the General Revenue Fund to the STAR Bonds 5Revenue Fund, the State sales tax increment for the second 6preceding month, less 3% of that amount, which shall be 7transferred into the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund 8and shall be used by the Department of Revenue, subject to 9appropriation, to cover the costs of the Department of Revenue 10in administering this Act. As soon as possible after the first 11day of each month, upon certification of the Department of 12Revenue, the Comptroller shall order transferred and the 13Treasurer shall transfer, from the Local Government Tax Fund 14to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, the local sales tax increment 15for the second preceding month, as provided in Section 6z-18 16of the State Finance Act and from the County and Mass Transit 17District Fund to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales 18tax increment for the second preceding month, as provided in 19Section 6z-20 of the State Finance Act. On or before the 25th 20day of each calendar month, the Department of Revenue shall 21prepare and certify to the Comptroller the disbursement of 22stated sums of money out of the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund to 23named municipalities and counties, the municipalities and 24counties to be those entitled to distribution of taxes or 25penalties paid to the Department of Revenue during the second 26preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to each   HB5556- 57 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1municipality or county shall be the amount of the State sales 2tax increment and the local sales tax increment (not including 3credit memoranda or the amount transferred into the Tax 4Compliance and Administration Fund) collected during the 5second preceding calendar month by the Department of Revenue 6from retailers and servicepersons on transactions at places of 7business located within a STAR bond district in that 8municipality or county, plus an amount the Department of 9Revenue determines is necessary to offset any amounts which 10were erroneously paid to a different taxing body, and not 11including an amount equal to the amount of refunds made during 12the second preceding calendar month by the Department of 13Revenue, and not including any amount which the Department of 14Revenue determines is necessary to offset any amounts which 15are payable to a different taxing body but were erroneously 16paid to the municipality or county. Within 10 days after 17receipt by the Comptroller of the disbursement certification 18to the municipalities and counties, which shall be given to 19the Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the Comptroller 20shall cause the orders to be drawn for the respective amounts 21in accordance with the directions contained in the 22certification. When certifying the amount of monthly 23disbursement to a municipality or county under this 24subsection, the Department of Revenue shall increase or 25decrease that amount by an amount necessary to offset any 26misallocation of previous disbursements. The offset amount   HB5556- 58 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1shall be the amount erroneously disbursed within the 6 months 2preceding the time a misallocation is discovered.3    (f) The corporate authorities of the political subdivision 4shall deposit the proceeds for the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund 5into a special fund of the political subdivision called the 6"[Name of political subdivision] STAR Bond District Revenue 7Fund" for the purpose of paying or reimbursing STAR bond 8project costs and obligations incurred in the payment of those 9costs. If the political subdivision fails to issue STAR bonds 10within 180 days after the first distribution to the political 11subdivision from the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, the Department 12of Revenue shall cease distribution of the State sales tax 13increment to the political subdivision, shall transfer any 14State sales tax increment in the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund to the 15General Revenue Fund, and shall cease deposits of State sales 16tax increment amounts into the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund. The 17political subdivision shall repay all the State sales tax 18increment distributed to the political subdivision to date, 19which amounts shall be deposited into the General Revenue 20Fund. If not repaid within 90 days after notice from the State, 21the Department of Revenue shall withhold distributions to the 22political subdivision from the Local Government Tax Fund until 23the excess amount is repaid, which withheld amounts shall be 24transferred to the General Revenue Fund. At such time as the 25political subdivision notifies the Department of Revenue in 26writing that it has issued STAR Bonds in accordance with this   HB5556- 59 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1Act and provides the Department with a copy of the political 2subdivision's official statement, bond purchase agreements, 3indenture, or other evidence of bond sale, the Department of 4Revenue shall resume deposits of the State sales tax increment 5into the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund and distribution of the State 6sales tax increment to the political subdivision in accordance 7with this Section.8    (g) If at any time after the seventh anniversary of the 9date of distribution of State sales tax increment from a STAR 10bond project the Auditor General determines that the 11percentage of the aggregate proceeds of STAR bonds issued to 12date that is derived from the State sales tax increment has 13exceeded 50% of the total development costs of that STAR Bonds 14project, no additional STAR bonds may be issued for that STAR 15Bonds project until that percentage is reduced to 50% or 16below. When the percentage has been reduced to 50% or below, 17the master developer shall have the right, at its own cost, to 18obtain a new audit prepared by an independent third-party 19auditor verifying compliance and shall provide such audit to 20the Auditor General for review and approval. Upon the Auditor 21General's determination from the audit that the percentage has 22been reduced to 50% or below, STAR bonds may again be issued 23for the STAR bond project.24    (h) A new tax increment financing district in a NOVA urban 25district may be established concurrent with or following the 26establishment of the NOVA urban district or other arrangement   HB5556- 60 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1in respect of a property tax assessment freeze and special 2payment. 3(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 4    (50 ILCS 475/5-70)5    Sec. 5-70. Restrictions. STAR bond districts may lie 6within an enterprise zone. During any period of time that STAR 7bonds are outstanding for a STAR bond district, a developer 8may not use any land located in the STAR bond district, except 9for a NOVA urban district, for any retail store whose primary 10business is the sale of automobiles, including trucks and 11other automotive vehicles with 4 wheels designed for passenger 12transportation on public streets and thoroughfares. No STAR 13bond district other than a NOVA urban district may contain 14more than 900,000 square feet of floor space devoted to 15traditional retail use, which does not include space devoted 16to entertainment venues, hotels, warehouse space, storage 17space, or approved development users.18(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 19    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 20Division 23 to Article 10 and changing as follows: 21    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 23 heading new)22Division 23. Megaprojects   HB5556- 61 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    (35 ILCS 200/10-1005 new)2    Sec. 10-1005. Megaproject Assessment Freeze and Payment 3Law; definitions. This Division 23 may be cited as the 4Megaproject Assessment Freeze and Payment Law.5    As used in this Division:6    "Assessment officer" means the chief county assessment 7officer of the county in which the megaproject is located. 8    "Assessment period" means the period beginning on the 9first day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which 10a megaproject is placed in service and ending on the date when 11the megaproject no longer qualifies as a megaproject under 12this Division. 13    "Base tax year" means the tax year prior to the first 14calendar year during which the Department issues a megaproject 15certificate under this Division. 16    "Base year" means:17        (1) the calendar year prior to the calendar year in 18    which the Department issues the megaproject certificate, 19    if the Department issues a megaproject certificate for a 20    project located on the property without granting 21    preliminary approval for the project pursuant to Section 22    10-940; or23        (2) the calendar year prior to the calendar year in 24    which the Department grants that preliminary approval, if 25    the Department grants preliminary approval pursuant to 26    Section 10-940 for a megaproject located on the property.   HB5556- 62 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    "Base year valuation" means the assessed value, in the 2base year, of the property comprising the megaproject. 3    "Company" means one or more entities whose aggregate 4investment in the megaproject meets the minimum investment 5required under this Division. The term "company" includes a 6company affiliate unless the context clearly indicates 7otherwise. 8    "Company affiliate" means an entity that joins with or is 9an affiliate of a company and that participates in the 10investment in, or financing of, a megaproject. 11    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 12Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 13Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 14services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 15average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 16    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 17Opportunity. 18    "Eligible costs" means all costs incurred by or on behalf 19of, or allocated to, a company, prior to the Department's 20issuance of the megaproject certificate or during the 21investment period, to create or construct a megaproject. 22"Eligible costs" includes, without limitation:23        (1) the purchase, site preparation, renovation, 24    rehabilitation, and construction of land, buildings, 25    structures, equipment, and furnishings used for or in the 26    megaproject;  HB5556- 63 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1        (2) any goods or services for the megaproject that are 2    purchased and capitalized under generally accepted 3    accounting principles, including any organizational costs 4    and research and development costs incurred in Illinois;5        (3) capitalized lease costs for land, buildings, 6    structures, and equipment valued at their present value 7    using the interest rate at which the company borrows funds 8    prevailing at the time the company entered into the lease;9        (4) infrastructure development costs;10        (5) debt service and project financing costs;11        (6) noncapitalized research and development costs;12        (7) job training and education costs;13        (8) lease and relocation costs; and14        (9) amounts expended by a company or company affiliate 15    as a nonresponsible party pursuant to a voluntary program 16    of site remediation, including amounts expended to obtain 17    a No Further Remediation Letter from the Illinois 18    Environmental Protection Agency. 19    "Entity" means a sole proprietor, partnership, firm, 20corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 21business enterprise. 22    "Full-time employee" means an individual who is employed 23for consideration for at least 35 hours each week or who 24renders any other standard of service generally accepted by 25industry custom or practice as a full-time employee. An 26individual for whom a W-2 is issued by a professional employer   HB5556- 64 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1organization is a full-time employee if he or she is employed 2in the service of the applicant for at least 35 hours each week 3or renders any other standard of service generally accepted by 4industry custom or practice as a full-time employment. An 5owner, operator, or tenant who employs labor or services at a 6specific site or facility under contract with another may 7declare one full-time job for every 1,820 man-hours worked per 8year under the contract. Vacations, paid holidays, and sick 9time are included in this computation, but overtime is not 10considered a part of regular hours. 11    "High Impact Business" means a project that has been 12designated by the Department as a High Impact Business under 13Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 14    "Incentive agreement" means an agreement between a 15company, a local municipality, and the taxing districts 16obligating the company to make the special payment under this 17Division, in addition to paying property taxes, during the 18incentive period for a megaproject. 19    "Incentive period" means the period beginning on the first 20day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which the 21megaproject is placed in service and each calendar year 22thereafter until the earlier of (i) the expiration or 23termination of the incentive agreement or (ii) the revocation 24of the megaproject certificate. 25    "Inducement resolution" means a resolution adopted by the 26local municipality setting forth the commitment of the local   HB5556- 65 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1municipality to enter into an incentive agreement. 2    "Investment period" means the period ending 7 years after 3the date on which the Department issues the megaproject 4certificate, or such other longer period of time as the local 5municipality, the taxing districts, and the company may agree 6to, not to exceed an initial period of 10 years. 7    "Local municipality" means the city, village, or 8incorporated town in which the megaproject is located or, if 9the megaproject is located in an unincorporated area, the 10county in which the megaproject is located. 11    "Megaproject" means the project set forth in the company's 12tax credit agreement or high impact business designation. 13    "Megaproject certificate" means a certificate issued by 14the Department that authorizes an assessment freeze as 15provided in this Division. 16    "Minimum investment" means an investment in the 17megaproject of at least $100,000,000 in eligible costs within 18the investment period. 19    "Minority person" means a person who is a citizen or 20lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is any 21of the following: 22        (1) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 23    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 24    America, including Central America, and who maintains 25    tribal affiliation or community attachment). 26        (2) Asian (a person having origins in any of the   HB5556- 66 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 2    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 3    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 4    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam). 5        (3) Black or African American (a person having origins 6    in any of the black racial groups of Africa). 7        (4) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 8    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 9    culture or origin, regardless of race). 10        (5) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 11    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 12    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands). 13    "Minority-owned business" means a business that is at 14least 51% owned by one or more minority persons, or that, in 15the case of a corporation, has at least 51% of its stock owned 16by one or more minority persons, and that, in either case, is 17managed and operated on a daily basis by one or more of the 18minority individuals who own the business. 19    "New full-time employee" means a full-time employee who 20first became employed by the owner, operator, contractor, or 21tenant of the megaproject during the incentive period or 22investment period and whose hiring results in a net increase 23in the owner, operator, contractor, or tenant's total number 24of full-time Illinois employees. 25    "New full-time employee" does not include: 26        (1) a person who was previously employed in Illinois   HB5556- 67 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    by the applicant or a related family member prior to the 2    onset of the investment or incentive period; or 3        (2) an individual who has a direct or indirect 4    ownership interest of at least 5% in the profits, capital, 5    or value of the applicant. 6    "Placed in service" means that the company has commenced 7its business operations at the megaproject site and has met 8its job creation requirements under this Section by hiring or 9causing to be hired at least 100 new full-time employees who 10provide support to the megaproject's business operations and 11work in the State of Illinois. If a company pauses or shuts 12down its business operations for a period of more than 30 days, 13then the megaproject shall no longer be considered placed in 14service. 15    "Project" means land, buildings, and other improvements on 16the land, including water facilities, sewage treatment and 17disposal facilities, and all other machinery, apparatuses, 18equipment, office facilities, related infrastructure, and 19furnishings that are considered necessary, suitable, or useful 20by a company and comprise the megaproject, including all such 21property subject to assessment under the Property Tax Code. 22    "Special payment" means the annual amount paid in addition 23to property taxes paid during the incentive period as provided 24in the incentive agreement. 25    "Sports stadium" means a facility, stadium, arena, or 26other structure where athletic contests are held and sports   HB5556- 68 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1teams practice and perform. 2    "Tax credit agreement" means an agreement entered into by 3the company and the Department under the Economic Development 4for Growing Economy Tax Credit Act, the Reimagining Energy and 5Vehicles in Illinois Act, or the Manufacturing Illinois Chips 6for Real Opportunity (MICRO) Act. 7    "Taxing district" has the meaning given to that term in 8Section 1-150. 9    "Termination date" means the last day of a calendar year 10that is no later than the 23rd year following the first 11calendar year in which a megaproject is placed in service. A 12company may apply to the local municipality and taxing 13districts prior to the termination date for an extension of 14the termination date beyond the 23rd year for up to 17 15additional years, for a total of 40 years, which 17-year 16extension may, in the case of a megaproject located within a 17local municipality with a population of 2,000,000 or more, be 18applied for by the company and approved by the corporate 19authorities of the local municipality upon the initial 20application by the company. The corporate authorities of the 21local municipality and the taxing districts shall approve an 22extension by resolution upon a finding of substantial public 23benefit. A copy of the resolution must be delivered to the 24Department within 30 days of the date the resolution was 25adopted. If the incentive agreement is terminated under 26Section 10-1035, then the termination date is the date the   HB5556- 69 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1agreement is terminated.  2    (35 ILCS 200/10-1010 new)3    Sec. 10-1010. Valuation during incentive period; 4eligibility.5    (a) Property that receives a megaproject certificate from 6the Department is eligible for an assessment freeze, as 7provided in this Division, eliminating from consideration, for 8assessment purposes during the incentive period, the value 9added to the property by the project and limiting the total 10valuation of the property during the incentive period to the 11base year valuation. If the company does not anticipate 12completing the project within the investment period, then the 13local municipality and taxing districts may approve one or 14more extensions of time to complete the project. However, the 15local municipality and taxing districts may not extend the 16project for a period that exceeds 5 years after the last day of 17the investment period. Unless approved as part of the original 18incentive agreement, the corporate authorities of the local 19municipality and taxing districts may approve an extension 20under this subsection by resolution, a copy of which must be 21delivered to the Department within 30 days after the date the 22resolution is adopted.23    (b) To qualify for a megaproject certificate, the company 24must:25        (1) make the minimum investment in the megaproject   HB5556- 70 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    during the investment period; 2        (2) enter into an incentive agreement with the local 3    municipality and taxing districts as described in this 4    Division; 5        (3) enter into a project labor agreement with the 6    applicable local building trades council prior to the 7    commencement of any demolition, building construction, or 8    building renovation related to the megaproject; 9        (4) establish the goal of awarding 20% of the total 10    dollar amount of contracts that are related to the 11    megaproject and are awarded by the company during each 12    calendar year to minority-owned businesses; 13        (5) create at least 100 new full-time jobs as a result 14    of the megaproject; and 15        (6) have executed a tax credit agreement with the 16    Department or received a high impact business designation 17    from the Department. 18    (c) For purposes of this Division, if a single company 19enters into a financing arrangement of the type described in 20subsection (b) of Section 10-1055, the investment in or 21financing of the property by a developer, lessor, financing 22entity, or other third party in accordance with this 23arrangement is considered investment by the company. 24Investment by a related person to the company is considered 25investment by the company.    HB5556- 71 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    (35 ILCS 200/10-1015 new)2    Sec. 10-1015. Incentive agreement; assessment freeze for 3megaprojects; incentive period; inducement resolution; 4location of the project; criteria to qualify.5    (a) To obtain the benefits provided in this Division, the 6company shall apply in writing to the local municipality and 7taxing districts to enter into an incentive agreement with the 8municipality and taxing districts, in the form and manner 9required by the local municipality and taxing districts, 10respectively, and shall certify to the facts asserted in the 11application. 12    (b) The corporate authorities of the local municipality, 13prior to entering into an incentive agreement under this 14Section, shall hold a public hearing to consider the 15application. The amount and terms of the proposed special 16payment and the duration of the incentive agreement shall be 17considered at the public hearing. 18    (c) Copies of the completed application shall be provided 19to each taxing district for which property taxes were assessed 20on the property for the immediately preceding tax year. Those 21copies shall be provided at least 30 days prior to the 22scheduled public hearing at which the corporate authorities of 23the local municipality will consider the application. 24    (d) The company, the local municipality, and the taxing 25districts shall enter into an incentive agreement requiring 26the special payment described in Section 10-1020. The   HB5556- 72 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1corporate authorities of the local municipality shall adopt an 2ordinance approving the incentive agreement. 3    (e) If an incentive agreement is not executed within 5 4years after the local municipality's adoption of an inducement 5resolution, expenditures incurred by the company more than 5 6years prior to the execution of the incentive agreement or, in 7the case of a megaproject located within a local municipality 8with a population of 2,000,000 or more, more than 10 years 9prior to the execution of the incentive agreement, shall not 10qualify as part of the minimum investment. 11    (f) To be eligible to enter into an incentive agreement 12under this Division, the company must commit to a project that 13meets the investment and new job creation requirements set 14forth in the company's tax credit agreement or high impact 15business designation. In no event shall the company be 16required to invest less than $100,000,000 or create fewer than 17100 new full-time jobs.  1819    (35 ILCS 200/10-1020 new)20    Sec. 10-1020. Contents of incentive agreement.21    (a) The incentive agreement under Section 10-1015 must 22require the company to pay, or be responsible for the payment 23of, an annual special payment to the local municipality and 24the taxing districts, beginning with the first tax year for 25which the assessment freeze under this Division is applied to   HB5556- 73 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1the megaproject. The amount of the special payment shall be 2established by the local municipality and taxing districts in 3the incentive agreement and may be a fixed amount for the 4duration of the incentive period or may be subject to 5adjustment (downward or upward) based on factors memorialized 6in the incentive agreement.7    Unless the special payment is negotiated as a fixed 8payment for the duration of the incentive period, the parties 9shall conduct an impact analysis study on the megaproject 10every 5 years, and the special payment shall be adjusted based 11on the results of that study; provided, however, the 12adjustment shall not be less than the initial special payment 13adjusted for inflation as measured by the Consumer Price 14Index. 15    The portion of the special payment due to the local school 16districts shall be increased annually by the lesser of (i) 5% 17or (ii) the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price 18Index for the 12 months ending in September of the immediately 19preceding calendar year, and may be further increased or 20decreased every 5 years based on the results of the impact 21analysis study. 22    (b) The incentive agreement shall obligate the company to 23operate the megaproject at the designated project location for 24a minimum of 20 years.25    (c) The incentive agreement may contain such other terms 26and conditions as are mutually agreeable to the local   HB5556- 74 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1municipality, the taxing districts, and the company and are 2consistent with the requirements of this Division, including, 3without limitation, operational and additional job creation 4requirements.5    (d) In addition, all incentive agreements entered into 6pursuant to Section 10-1015 must include, as the first portion 7of the document, a recapitulation of the remaining contents of 8the document, which shall include the following: 9        (1) the legal name of each party to the agreement;10        (2) the street address of the project and the property 11    subject to the agreement;12        (3) the agreed minimum investment, which shall not be 13    less than the investment amount required in the tax credit 14    agreement or high impact business designation;15        (3.5) the agreed number of new jobs to be created, 16    which shall not be less than the number of new jobs 17    required in the tax credit agreement or high impact 18    business designation; 19        (4) the term of the agreement;20        (5) a schedule showing the amount of the special 21    payment and its calculation for each year of the 22    agreement;23        (6) a schedule showing the amount to be distributed 24    annually to each taxing district, as set forth in the 25    incentive agreement;26        (7) any other feature or aspect of the agreement which   HB5556- 75 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    may affect the calculation of items (5) and (6) of this 2    subsection; and3        (8) the party or parties to the agreement who are 4    responsible for updating the information contained in the 5    summary document. 6    (35 ILCS 200/10-1025 new)7    Sec. 10-1025. Minimum job creation requirements.8    (a) The company must hire the same number of new full-time 9employees as is required in the company's tax credit agreement 10or high impact business designation, which in no event shall 11be less than 100. These new full-time employees must be hired 12to support the business operations of the megaproject and be 13located within the State of Illinois. 14    (b) A company may not satisfy the requirements of this 15Section by relocating jobs from one site in Illinois to 16another site in Illinois.  17    (35 ILCS 200/10-1030 new)18    Sec. 10-1030. Installment bills; distribution of special 19payments.20    (a) The local municipality shall prepare a bill for the 21company for each installment of the special payment according 22to the schedule set forth in paragraph (5) of subsection (d) of 23Section 10-1020, or as modified pursuant to paragraph (7) of 24subsection (d) of Section 10-925, and the company shall make   HB5556- 76 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1direct payments to the affected taxing entities according to 2the schedule in paragraph (6) of subsection (d) of Section 310-1020 or as modified in paragraph (7) of subsection (d) of 4Section 10-1020. 5    (b) The company shall make direct payments of the special 6payment to the taxing districts associated with the 7megaproject within 30 days after receipt by the company of the 8bill prepared by the local municipality.9    (c) Misallocations of the special payments may be 10corrected by adjusting later distributions, but these 11adjustments must be made in the next succeeding year following 12identification and resolution of the misallocation. To the 13extent that distributions have been made improperly in 14previous years, claims for adjustment must be made within one 15year of the distribution. 16    (35 ILCS 200/10-1035 new)17    Sec. 10-1035. Termination of incentive agreement; 18automatic termination; minimum level of investment and new job 19creation required to remain qualified for assessment freeze.20    (a) The local municipality, the taxing districts, and the 21company may mutually agree to terminate the incentive 22agreement at any time. From the date of termination, the 23megaproject is subject to assessment on the basis of the 24then-current fair cash value.25    (b) An incentive agreement shall be terminated if the   HB5556- 77 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1company fails to satisfy the minimum investment level or the 2job creation requirements provided in this Division. If the 3incentive agreement is terminated under this subsection, the 4megaproject is subject to assessment on the basis of the 5then-current fair cash value beginning in the tax year during 6which the termination occurs.7    (c) An incentive agreement shall terminate if, at any 8time, the company no longer has the minimum level of new job 9creation and investment as provided in this Division, without 10regard to depreciation. 11    (35 ILCS 200/10-1040 new)12    Sec. 10-1040. Megaproject administration. The 13administration of a megaproject shall be under the 14jurisdiction of the local municipality that approved the 15incentive agreement by ordinance. Each local municipality that 16approves an incentive agreement by ordinance shall, by 17ordinance, designate a Megaproject Administrator for the 18megaproject within its jurisdiction. A Megaproject 19Administrator must be an officer or employee of the 20municipality or county. The Megaproject Administrator shall be 21the liaison between the approving municipality or county, the 22Department, and the Department of Revenue. 23    (35 ILCS 200/10-1045 new)24    Sec. 10-1045. Megaproject applications; certification as a   HB5556- 78 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1megaproject and revocation of certification.2    (a) The Department shall receive applications for 3megaproject certificates under this Division. The Department 4shall promptly notify the assessment officer when the 5Department receives an application under this Section. The 6Department's rules shall provide that an applicant may request 7preliminary approval of the megaproject before the project 8begins, before the applicant has entered into a fully executed 9incentive agreement with the local municipality and taxing 10districts, or before the project has been placed in service. 11    (b) An applicant for a megaproject certificate under this 12Division must provide evidence to the Department of a fully 13executed incentive agreement between the company, the local 14municipality, and the taxing districts as described in this 15Division. 16    (c) An applicant for a megaproject certificate under this 17Division must provide evidence to the Department of a fully 18executed project labor agreement entered into with the 19applicable local building trades council prior to the 20commencement of any demolition, building construction, or 21building renovation at the project. If the demolition, 22building construction, or building renovation begins after the 23application is approved, then the applicant must transmit a 24copy of the fully executed project labor agreement to the 25Department as soon as possible after the agreement is 26executed.   HB5556- 79 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    (d) An applicant for a megaproject certificate under this 2Division must provide evidence to the Department that the 3company has established the goal of awarding 20% of the total 4dollar amount of contracts awarded during each calendar year 5by the company, that are related to the project, to 6minority-owned businesses. 7    (e) The Department shall approve an application for a 8megaproject certificate if the Department finds that the 9project meets the requirements of this Division. 10    (f) Upon approval of the application, the Department shall 11issue a megaproject certificate to the applicant and transmit 12a copy to the assessment officer and the Department of 13Revenue. The certificate shall identify the property on which 14the megaproject is located. 15    (g) For each calendar year following issuance of the 16megaproject certificate, until the minimum investment and new 17job creation requirements have been met and the megaproject 18has been placed in service, the company shall deliver a report 19to the Department on the status of construction or creation of 20the megaproject and the amount of minimum investment made in 21the megaproject during the preceding calendar year. If the 22Department determines, in accordance with the Administrative 23Review Law and the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, that 24a project for which a certificate has been issued has not met 25the minimum investment and job creation requirements of this 26Division within the investment period, the Department shall   HB5556- 80 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1revoke the certificate by written notice to the taxpayer of 2record and transmit a copy of the revocation to the assessment 3officer. 4    (h) If the local municipality notifies the Department that 5the incentive agreement between the company, the local 6municipality, and the taxing districts has been terminated, 7the Department shall revoke the certificate by written notice 8to the taxpayer of record and transmit a copy of the revocation 9to the assessment officer.  10    (35 ILCS 200/10-1050 new)11    Sec. 10-1050. Computation of valuation.12    (a) Upon receipt of the megaproject certificate from the 13Department, the assessment officer shall determine the base 14year valuation and shall make a notation on each statement of 15assessment during the assessment period that the valuation of 16the project is based upon the issuance of a megaproject 17certificate. 18    (b) Upon revocation of a megaproject certificate, the 19assessment officer shall compute the assessed valuation of the 20project on the basis of the then-current fair cash value of the 21property.  22    (35 ILCS 200/10-1055 new)23    Sec. 10-1055. Transfers of interest in a megaproject; 24sale-leaseback arrangement; requirements.  HB5556- 81 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    (a) Subject to the terms of the incentive agreement 2between the company, the local municipality, and the taxing 3district, ownership of or any interest in the megaproject and 4any and all related project property, including, without 5limitation, transfers of indirect beneficial interests and 6equity interests in a company owning a megaproject, shall not 7affect the assessment freeze or the validity of the 8megaproject certificate issued under this Division. 9Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the 10incentive agreement shall be a covenant running with the land. 11    (b) A company may enter into lending, financing, security, 12leasing, or similar arrangements, or a succession of such 13arrangements, with a financing entity concerning all or part 14of a project including, without limitation, a sale-leaseback 15arrangement, equipment lease, build-to-suit lease, synthetic 16lease, nordic lease, defeased tax benefit, or transfer lease, 17an assignment, sublease, or similar arrangement, or succession 18of those arrangements, with one or more financing entities 19concerning all or part of a project, regardless of the 20identity of the income tax or fee owner of the megaproject. 21Neither the original transfer to the financing entity nor the 22later transfer from the financing entity back to the company, 23pursuant to terms in the sale-leaseback agreement, shall 24affect the assessment freeze or the validity of the 25megaproject certificate issued under this Division, regardless 26of whether the income tax basis is changed for income tax   HB5556- 82 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1purposes. 2    (c) The Department must receive notice of all transfers 3undertaken with respect to other projects to effect a 4financing. Notice shall be made in writing within 60 days 5after the transfer, shall identify each transferee, and shall 6contain other information required by the Department with the 7appropriate returns. Failure to meet this notice requirement 8does not adversely affect the assessment freeze.  9    (35 ILCS 200/10-1060 new)10    Sec. 10-1060. Minimum investment by company affiliates. To 11be eligible for the benefits of this Division, a company must 12invest the minimum investment. Investments by company 13affiliates during the investment period may be applied toward 14the minimum investment under this Division regardless of 15whether the company affiliate was part of the project. To 16qualify for the assessment freeze, the minimum investment must 17be made in connection with the megaproject. 18    (35 ILCS 200/10-1065 new)19    Sec. 10-1065. Projects to be valued at fair cash value for 20purposes of bonded indebtedness and limitations on property 21tax extensions. Projects to which an assessment freeze applies 22pursuant to this Division shall be valued at their fair cash 23value for purposes of calculating a municipality's general 24obligation bond limits and a taxing district's limitation on   HB5556- 83 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1tax extensions. 2    (35 ILCS 200/10-1070 new)3    Sec. 10-1070. Abatements. Any taxing district, upon a 4majority vote of its governing authority, may, after the 5determination of the assessed valuation as set forth in this 6Division, order the clerk of the appropriate municipality or 7county to abate any portion of real property taxes otherwise 8levied or extended by the taxing district on a megaproject. 9    (35 ILCS 200/10-1075 new)10    Sec. 10-1075. Filing of returns, contracts, and other 11information; due date of payments and returns.12    (a) The company and the local municipality shall file 13notices, reports, and other information as required by the 14Department.15    (b) Special payments are due at the same time as property 16tax payments and property tax returns are due for the 17megaproject property.18    (c) Failure to make a timely special payment results in 19the assessment of penalties as if the payment were a 20delinquent property tax payment or return.21    (d) Within 30 days after the date of execution of an 22incentive agreement, a copy of the incentive agreement must be 23filed with the Department, the chief county assessment 24officer, and the county auditor for the county in which the   HB5556- 84 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1megaproject is located. 2    (35 ILCS 200/10-1080 new)3    Sec. 10-1080. Rules. The Department may issue rulings and 4adopt rules as necessary to carry out the purpose of this 5Division. 6    (35 ILCS 200/10-1085 new)7    Sec. 10-1085. Prohibition on multiple credits, exemptions, 8and freezes. An applicant for a megaproject certificate who 9qualifies for an assessment freeze under this Section is not 10entitled to any other property tax credits, exemptions, or 11assessment freezes relating to the megaproject. 12    (35 ILCS 200/10-1090 new)13    Sec. 10-1090. Building materials exemption for 14megaprojects. An applicant that is eligible for a megaproject 15certificate under this Division 23 of Article 10 is also 16eligible for the building materials exemption under Section 17605-1115 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 18    (35 ILCS 200/10-1095 new)19    Sec. 10-1095. Professional Sports stadiums. 20Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 21Department shall not approve any megaproject certificate 22application that includes as part of the application the   HB5556- 85 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1development of any facility, stadium, arena or other structure 2if: (1) a purpose of the location, facility, stadium, arena, 3or other structure is the holding of professional sports 4contests; or (2) the megaproject location, facility, stadium, 5arena, or other structure is within a one-mile radius of any 6structure that is developed on or after the effective date of 7this Act and has as one of its purposes the holding of 8professional sports contests, except for a megaproject located 9within a one-mile radius of an existing stadium that may be 10redeveloped on or after the effective date of this Act and has 11as one of its purposes the holding of professional sports 12contents 13    (35 ILCS 200/10-1096 new)14    Sec. 10-1096. Tax Increment Financing districts. A project 15that is located and operated in a Tax Increment Financing 16(TIF) district or TIF designated area is not eligible for a 17megaproject assessment freeze under this Section. The 18agreement shall provide that the megaproject certificate is 19void if an area on which the megaproject is located is 20designated as a TIF district or TIF designated area. 21    (35 ILCS 200/10-1097 new)22    Sec. 10-1097. Invalidity. If all or any part of this 23Division is determined to be unconstitutional or otherwise 24unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, a company   HB5556- 86 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1has 180 days from the date of the determination to transfer the 2megaproject's title to an authorized economic development 3authority that qualifies for property tax assessment under 4this Division.  HB5556- 87 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    50 ILCS 475/5-54    50 ILCS 475/5-105    50 ILCS 475/5-156    50 ILCS 475/5-207    50 ILCS 475/5-308    50 ILCS 475/5-359    50 ILCS 475/5-4510    50 ILCS 475/5-7011    35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 12    23 heading new13    35 ILCS 200/10-1005 new14    35 ILCS 200/10-1010 new15    35 ILCS 200/10-1015 new16    35 ILCS 200/10-1020 new17    35 ILCS 200/10-1025 new18    35 ILCS 200/10-1030 new19    35 ILCS 200/10-1035 new20    35 ILCS 200/10-1040 new21    35 ILCS 200/10-1045 new22    35 ILCS 200/10-1050 new23    35 ILCS 200/10-1055 new24    35 ILCS 200/10-1060 new25    35 ILCS 200/10-1065 new  HB5556- 88 -LRB104 18309 HLH 31749 b1    35 ILCS 200/10-1070 new2    35 ILCS 200/10-1075 new3    35 ILCS 200/10-1080 new4    35 ILCS 200/10-1085 new5    35 ILCS 200/10-1090 new6    35 ILCS 200/10-1095 new7    35 ILCS 200/10-1096 new8    35 ILCS 200/10-1097 new